Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 33

Aquaculture

43-33-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-33-101 (Acts 1991, ch. 481, § 1), concerning the short title to the Aquaculture Policy Act of 1991, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 622, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

43-33-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-33-102 (Acts 1991, ch. 481, § 1), concerning the aquaculture advisory board, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 622, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

43-33-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-33-103 (Acts 1991, ch. 481, § 1), concerning the duties and powers of the aquaculture advisory board, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 622, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

43-33-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 43-33-104 (Acts 1991, ch. 481, § 1; 2000, ch. 880, § 3), concerning the state aquaculture plan, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 622, § 2, effective July 1, 2008.

43-33-105 — 43-33-125. [Reserved.]

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or proclamation to the contrary, any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of fish farming may raise to maturity hybrid striped bass for the specific purpose of making the hybrid striped bass available for purchase by wholesalers, restaurants and members of the public. The person, firm or corporation shall comply with the applicable rules of the Tennessee fish and wildlife commission.

For the purposes of this section, “fish farming” means the rearing of artificially propagated, nonbait fish for the specific and bona fide purpose of making the fish available to persons wishing to procure the fish by purchase.

Acts 1991, ch. 481, § 2; 2012, ch. 993, § 5.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment substituted “fish and wildlife commission” for “wildlife resources commission” at the end of the last sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 14. June 30, 2012.

43-33-126. Fish farming — Hybrid striped bass.